Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 1. Divorce and Annulment.

Collateral references. —

4 Am. Jur. 2d, Annulment of Marriage, § 1 et seq.

24 Am. Jur. 2d, Divorce and Separation, § 1 et seq.

27A C.J.S., Divorce, § 1 et seq.

55 C.J.S., Marriage, § 70 et seq.

Effect as res judicata of denial of divorce in sister state or foreign country, 4 ALR2d 107.

Delay in bringing suit as affecting right to divorce, 4 ALR2d 1321.

False allegation of plaintiff’s domicil or residence in the state as ground for vacation of default decree of divorce, 6 ALR2d 596.

Standing of strangers to divorce proceeding to attack validity of divorce decree, 12 ALR2d 717.

Power to grant annulment of marriage against nonresident on constructive service, 43 ALR2d 1086.

Right to attack validity of marriage after death of party thereto, 47 ALR2d 1393.

Limitation of actions for annulment of marriage, 52 ALR2d 1163.

Injunction against suit in another state or county for divorce or separation, 54 ALR2d 1240.

Necessity and sufficiency of corroboration of plaintiff’s testimony concerning ground for annulment of marriage, 71 ALR2d 620.

Decree in suit for “separation” as res judicata in subsequent suit for divorce or annulment, 90 ALR2d 745.

Attorney’s right to continue divorce or separation suit against wishes of his client, 92 ALR2d 1009.

Mental incompetency of defendant at time of action as precluding annulment of marriage, 97 ALR2d 483.

Husband’s liability for expenses incurred by wife in investigating his marital transgressions, 99 ALR2d 264.

Provision of contract or stipulation waiving wife’s right to counsel fees in event of divorce or separation action, 3 ALR3d 716.

Court’s power to vacate decree of divorce or separation upon request of both parties, 3 A.L.R.3d 1216.

Power of incompetent spouse’s guardian, committee, or next friend to sue for granting or vacation of divorce or annulment of marriage, or to make a compromise or settlement in such suit, 6 ALR3d 681.

Assumption or denial of jurisdiction of action involving matrimonial disputes, 9 ALR3d 545.

Jurisdiction on constructive or substituted service, in divorce or alimony action, to reach property within state, 10 ALR3d 212.

Validity of conditional gift depending on divorce or separation, 14 ALR3d 1219.

Right of one spouse, over objections, to voluntarily dismiss claim for divorce, annulment, or similar marital relief, 16 ALR3d 283.

Remarriage as affecting right to appeal from divorce decree, 29 ALR3d 1167.

Enforcement of antenuptial contract or settlement conditioned upon marriage, where marriage was subsequently declared void, 46 ALR3d 1403.

Valid foreign divorce as affecting local order previously entered for separate maintenance, 49 ALR3d 1266.

Right of indigent to proceed in marital action without payment of costs, 52 ALR3d 844.

Effect of invalidity of provision conditioning testamentary gift upon divorce of beneficiary, on alternative provision conditioning gift upon spouse’s death, 74 ALR3d 1095.

Appointment of counsel for indigent husband and wife in action for divorce or separation, 85 ALR3d 983.

Vacating or setting aside divorce decree after remarriage of party, 17 ALR4th 1153.

Jury trial in state court divorce proceedings, 56 ALR4th 955.

Insanity as defense to divorce or separate suit — post-1950 cases, 67 ALR4th 277.

Sec. 25.24.010.
Right of action for divorce.

A husband or wife may maintain an action against the other for divorce or to have the marriage declared void.

History.

(§ 12.01 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

09.55.070

. Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For grounds for personal jurisdiction over a nonresident in an action for divorce, see AS

09.05.015(a)(12)

.

Sec. 25.24.020.
Void marriages.

A marriage which is prohibited by law on account of consanguinity between the persons, or a subsequent marriage contracted by a person during the life of a former husband or wife which marriage has not been annulled or dissolved is void.

History.

(§ 12.02 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.080. Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For criminal provisions prohibiting unlawful marrying, see AS

11.51.140

; for provisions specifying what marriages are prohibited, see AS

25.05.021

.

Sec. 25.24.030.
Voidable marriages.

A marriage may be declared void for any of the following causes existing at the time of the marriage:

that the party in whose behalf it is sought to have the marriage declared void was under the age of legal consent, and the marriage was contracted without the consent of the parents, guardian, or person having charge of that party, unless, after attaining the age of consent, the party for any time freely cohabited with the other as husband and wife;

that either party was of unsound mind, unless that party, after coming to reason, freely cohabited with the other as husband and wife;

that the consent of either party was obtained by fraud, unless that party afterwards, with full knowledge of the facts constituting the fraud, freely cohabited with the other as husband and wife;

that the consent of either party was obtained by force, unless that party afterwards freely cohabited with the other as husband and wife;

failure to consummate the marriage at the time of the marriage and continuing at the commencement of the action.

History.

(§ 12.03 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.090. Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For provisions concerning voidable marriages, see AS

25.05.031

.

Sec. 25.24.040.
Action to declare marriage valid.

When either the husband or wife claims or pretends that the marriage is void or voidable, the other spouse may bring an action to have the marriage declared valid.
The court may determine if the marriage is void from the beginning or from the time of the judgment or that it is valid.

History.

(§ 12.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.100. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 25.24.050.
Grounds for divorce.

A divorce may be granted for any of the following grounds:

failure to consummate the marriage at the time of the marriage and continuing at the commencement of the action;

adultery;

conviction of a felony;

wilful desertion for a period of one year;

either

cruel and inhuman treatment calculated to impair health or endanger life;

personal indignities rendering life burdensome; or

incompatibility of temperament;

habitual gross drunkenness contracted since marriage and continuing for one year prior to the commencement of the action;

[Repealed, § 68 ch 127 SLA 1974.]

incurable mental illness when the spouse has been confined to an institution for a period of at least 18 months immediately preceding the commencement of the action; the status as to the support and maintenance of the mentally ill person is not altered in any way by the granting of the divorce;

addiction of either party, subsequent to the marriage, to the habitual use of opium, morphine, cocaine, or a similar drug.

History.

(§ 12.05 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 3 SLA 1974; am §§ 67, 68 ch 127 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.110. Renumbered in 1983.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 3, SLA 1974 (CSHB 102), see 1973 Senate Journal Supplement No. 13, p. 650.

Sec. 25.24.060.
Mediation.

Except as provided in (f) and (g) of this section, at any time within 30 days after a complaint or cross-complaint in a divorce action is filed, a party to the action may file a motion with the court requesting mediation, for the purpose of achieving a mutually agreeable settlement in termination of the marriage. When a party moves for settlement mediation, the other party shall answer the motion on the record, and the judge may order mediation. When no request for mediation is made, the court may at any time order the parties to submit to mediation if it determines that mediation may result in a more satisfactory settlement between the parties.

The court appoints the mediator. The court may appoint any person the court finds suitable to act as mediator. Each party shall have the right once to challenge peremptorily any mediator appointed.

Mediation shall be conducted informally as a conference or series of conferences. The parties to the action and a court-appointed representative of any unmarried children of the marriage under the age of 19 whose interests may be affected shall attend. Counsel for the parties may attend all such conferences.

After the first conference, either party may withdraw, or the mediator may terminate mediation if the mediator determines that mediation efforts are unsuccessful. Upon withdrawal by either party or termination by the mediator, the mediator shall notify the court that mediation efforts have failed, and the divorce action shall proceed in the usual manner.

Upon submission of the parties to mediation under this section, divorce proceedings then pending shall be stayed for a period of 30 days or until the court is notified that mediation efforts have failed. All court orders made under AS

25.24.140

remain in effect during the period of mediation.

The court may not order or refer parties to mediation in a divorce proceeding if a protective order issued or filed under AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.180

is in effect. The court may not order or refer parties to mediation if a party objects on the grounds that domestic violence has occurred between the parties unless the court finds that the conditions of (g)(1) — (3) of this section are met. If the court proposes or suggests mediation under this subsection,

mediation may not occur unless the victim of the alleged domestic violence agrees to the mediation; and

the court shall advise the parties that each party has the right to not agree to mediation and that the decision of each party will not bias other decisions of the court.

A mediator who receives a referral or order from a court to conduct mediation under (a) of this section shall evaluate whether domestic violence has occurred between the parties. A mediator may not engage in mediation when either party has committed a crime involving domestic violence unless

mediation is requested by the victim of the alleged domestic violence, or proposed by the court and agreed to by the victim;

mediation is provided by a mediator who is trained in domestic violence in a manner that protects the safety of the victim and any household member, taking into account the results of an assessment of the potential danger posed by the perpetrator and the risk of harm to the victim; and

the victim is permitted to have in attendance a person of the victim’s choice, including an attorney.

History.

(§ 2 ch 188 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 117 SLA 1992; am §§ 43, 44 ch 64 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.115. Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For legislative intent, see § 1, ch. 188, SLA 1975 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for court rule relating to mediation, see Rule 100, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

Sec. 25.24.070.
Confession of adultery.

In an action for divorce on the ground of adultery, a confession of adultery is not alone sufficient to justify a judgment of divorce.

History.

(§ 3.18 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.120. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 25.24.080.
Residence requirements for action to declare marriage void.

When a marriage has been solemnized and the plaintiff is a resident of the state, an action to declare the marriage void may be brought at any time.

History.

(§ 12.06 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 8 ch 67 SLA 1983)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.130. Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For grounds for personal jurisdiction over a nonresident in an action for annulment, see AS

09.05.015(a)(12)

.

Sec. 25.24.090.
Use of spouse’s residence.

Where one spouse is plaintiff in an action for divorce or to declare void a marriage that was not solemnized in the state, the residence of the other spouse in this state inures to the plaintiff’s benefit and the action may be instituted if the other spouse is at the time of its commencement qualified as to residence to institute a similar action.

History.

(§ 12.08 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 69 ch 127 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.150. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 25.24.100.
[Renumbered as AS 25.24.900.]

Sec. 25.24.110.
Separate domicile or residence.

In an action for divorce, a spouse may acquire a separate residence or domicile from that of the other spouse without reference among other factors to misconduct or consent of the other spouse.

History.

(§ 12.10 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 70 ch 127 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.170. Renumbered in 1983.

Collateral references. —

Domicile for state tax purposes of wife living apart from husband, 82 ALR3d 1274.

Sec. 25.24.120.
Defenses to adultery.

In a divorce action for adultery, the following defenses may be made:

procurement;

connivance;

the act has been expressly forgiven or impliedly forgiven by the voluntary cohabitation of the parties after knowledge of the act;

the plaintiff is also guilty of adultery and without procurement or connivance of the defendant and not forgiven as provided in the defenses to adultery; or

the action has not been commenced within two years after the discovery of the act by the plaintiff.

History.

(§ 12.11 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.180. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 25.24.130.
Defenses to other divorce grounds.

When the divorce action is for any of the grounds provided in AS

25.24.050

(4)-(6), the defense of procurement or that the defendant has been expressly forgiven may be made.
When the divorce action is for the ground provided in AS

25.24.050

(3), the defense of procurement or that the defendant has been expressly forgiven or that the action was not brought within two years after conviction may be made.

History.

(§ 12.12 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.190. Renumbered in 1983.

Collateral references. —

Condonation of cruel treatment as defense to action for divorce or separation, 32 ALR2d 107.

Reconciliation as affecting separation agreement or decree, 35 ALR2d 707; 36 ALR4th 502.

Sec. 25.24.140.
Orders during action.

During the pendency of the action, a spouse may, upon application and in appropriate circumstances, be awarded expenses, including

attorney fees and costs that reasonably approximate the actual fees and costs required to prosecute or defend the action; in applying this paragraph, the court shall take appropriate steps to ensure that the award of attorney fees does not contribute to an unnecessary escalation in the litigation;

reasonable spousal maintenance, including medical expenses; and

reasonable support for minor children in the care of the spouse and reasonable support for unmarried 18-year-old children of the marriage who are actively pursuing a high school diploma or an equivalent level of technical or vocational training and living as dependents with the spouse or designee of the spouse, if there is a legal obligation of the other spouse to provide support.

During the pendency of the action, upon application, a spouse is entitled to necessary protective orders, including orders

providing for the freedom of each spouse from the control of the other spouse;

for protection under AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.180

;

directing one spouse to vacate the marital residence or the home of the other spouse;

restraining a spouse from communicating directly or indirectly with the other spouse;

restraining a spouse from entering a propelled vehicle in the possession of or occupied by the other spouse; and

prohibiting a spouse from disposing of the property of either spouse or marital property without the permission of the other spouse or a court order.

Except as provided in (d) and (e) of this section, after a hearing, if both parties agree, the court may also order that the parties engage in personal or family counseling or mediation. In the order, the court shall provide for the payment of the costs of the counseling or mediation.

The court may not order or refer parties to mediation or family counseling under (c) of this section if a protective order issued or filed under AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.180

is in effect. The court may not order or refer parties to mediation or family counseling if a party objects on the grounds that domestic violence has occurred between the parties unless the court finds that the conditions of (e)(1) — (3) of this section are met. If the court proposes or suggests mediation under this subsection,

mediation may not occur unless the victim of the alleged domestic violence agrees to the mediation; and

the court shall advise the parties that each party has the right to not agree to mediation and that the decision of each party will not bias other decisions by the court.

A mediator or family counselor who receives a referral or order from a court to conduct mediation under (c) of this section shall evaluate whether domestic violence has occurred between the parties. A mediator or family counselor may not engage in mediation when either party has committed a crime involving domestic violence unless

mediation or family counseling is requested by the victim of the alleged domestic violence, or proposed by the court and agreed to by the victim;

mediation or family counseling is provided by a mediator or family counselor who is trained in domestic violence in a manner that protects the safety of the victim and any household member, taking into account the results of an assessment of the potential danger posed by the perpetrator and the risk of harm to the victim; and

the victim is permitted to have in attendance a person of the victim’s choice, including an attorney.

History.

(§ 12.13 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 71 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 5 ch 130 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 117 SLA 1992; am §§ 45 — 47 ch 64 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.200. Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For duty of parent and child to maintain each other, see AS

25.20.030

; for other restraining orders relating to domestic violence, see AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.130

.

Sec. 25.24.150.
Judgments for custody; supervised visitation.

In an action for divorce or for legal separation, for placement of a child when one or both parents have died, or as part of a child-in-need-of-aid proceeding for a child in state custody under AS 47.10, the court may, if it has jurisdiction under AS

25.30.300

—

25.30.320

, and is an appropriate forum under AS

25.30.350

and

25.30.360

, during the pendency of the action, or at the final hearing or at any time thereafter during the minority of a child of the marriage, make, modify, or vacate an order for the custody of or visitation with the minor child that may seem necessary or proper, including an order that provides for visitation by a grandparent or other person if that is in the best interests of the child. The court shall hear custody proceedings related to a child in state custody under AS 47.10 as part of the child-in-need-of-aid proceedings, as provided under AS

47.10.113

, unless notice is provided to all parties to the child-in-need-of-aid proceedings and no party objects to hearing the custody proceedings in another appropriate forum.

If a guardian ad litem for a child is appointed, the appointment shall be made under the terms of AS

25.24.310(c)

.

The court shall determine custody in accordance with the best interests of the child under AS

25.20.060

—

25.20.130

. In determining the best interests of the child the court shall consider

the physical, emotional, mental, religious, and social needs of the child;

the capability and desire of each parent to meet these needs;

the child’s preference if the child is of sufficient age and capacity to form a preference;

the love and affection existing between the child and each parent;

the length of time the child has lived in a stable, satisfactory environment and the desirability of maintaining continuity;

the willingness and ability of each parent to facilitate and encourage a close and continuing relationship between the other parent and the child, except that the court may not consider this willingness and ability if one parent shows that the other parent has sexually assaulted or engaged in domestic violence against the parent or a child, and that a continuing relationship with the other parent will endanger the health or safety of either the parent or the child;

any evidence of domestic violence, child abuse, or child neglect in the proposed custodial household or a history of violence between the parents;

evidence that substance abuse by either parent or other members of the household directly affects the emotional or physical well-being of the child;

other factors that the court considers pertinent.

In awarding custody the court may consider only those facts that directly affect the well-being of the child.

Notwithstanding the provisions of (d) of this section, in awarding custody the court shall comply with the provisions of 25 U.S.C. 1901 — 1963 (P.L. 95-608, the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978).

If the issue of child custody is before the court at the time it issues a judgment under AS

25.24.160

, the court shall concurrently issue a judgment for custody under this section unless, subject to AS

25.24.155

, the court delays the custody decision for a later time.

There is a rebuttable presumption that a parent who has a history of perpetrating domestic violence against the other parent, a child, or a domestic living partner may not be awarded sole legal custody, sole physical custody, joint legal custody, or joint physical custody of a child.

A parent has a history of perpetrating domestic violence under (g) of this section if the court finds that, during one incident of domestic violence, the parent caused serious physical injury or the court finds that the parent has engaged in more than one incident of domestic violence. The presumption may be overcome by a preponderance of the evidence that the perpetrating parent has successfully completed an intervention program for batterers, where reasonably available, that the parent does not engage in substance abuse, and that the best interests of the child require that parent’s participation as a custodial parent because the other parent is absent, suffers from a diagnosed mental illness that affects parenting abilities, or engages in substance abuse that affects parenting abilities, or because of other circumstances that affect the best interests of the child.

If the court finds that both parents have a history of perpetrating domestic violence under (g) of this section, the court shall either

award sole legal and physical custody to the parent who is less likely to continue to perpetrate the violence and require that the custodial parent complete a treatment program; or

if necessary to protect the welfare of the child, award sole legal or physical custody, or both, to a suitable third person if the person would not allow access to a violent parent except as ordered by the court.

If the court finds that a parent has a history of perpetrating domestic violence under (g) of this section, the court shall allow only supervised visitation by that parent with the child, conditioned on that parent’s participating in and successfully completing an intervention program for batterers, and a parenting education program, where reasonably available, except that the court may allow unsupervised visitation if it is shown by a preponderance of the evidence that the violent parent has completed a substance abuse treatment program if the court considers it appropriate, is not abusing alcohol or psychoactive drugs, does not pose a danger of mental or physical harm to the child, and unsupervised visitation is in the child’s best interests.

The fact that an abused parent suffers from the effects of the abuse does not constitute a basis for denying custody to the abused parent unless the court finds that the effects of the domestic violence are so severe that they render the parent unable to safely parent the child.

Except as provided in AS

25.20.095

and

25.20.110

, a court may not consider a parent’s activation to military service and deployment in determining the best interest of the child under (c) of this section. In this subsection, “deployment” has the meaning given in AS

25.20.095

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 160 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 167 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 61 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 1982; am §§ 2, 3 ch 88 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 52 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 76 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 133 SLA 1998; am §§ 4, 5 ch 111 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 44 SLA 2010; am § 7 ch 6 4SSLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly
AS 09.55.205. Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For action for failure to permit visitation, see AS

25.20.140

; for grandparents’ visitation rights, see AS

25.20.065

; for effect of the enactment of subsection (f) on Rule 54(b), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see § 5, ch. 76, SLA 1991 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 5, 2010, added subsection (

l

).

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), in the first sentence, inserted "or as a part of a child-in-need-of-aid proceeding for a child in state custody under AS 47.10" following "both parents have died,", added the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 18,
ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016, the 2016 amendment to subsection (a) applies "to proceedings for adoption or legal guardianship of a child in state custody under
AS 47.10 filed on or after January 1, 2017."

Sec. 25.24.152.
Children as dependents for tax purposes.

In an action for divorce, dissolution, or to declare a marriage void, the court may not unconditionally grant to a noncustodial parent the right to claim a child as a dependent under federal income tax laws. The court may grant a noncustodial parent the right to claim a child as a dependent under federal tax laws for a tax year if the noncustodial parent satisfies the requirements of federal law and was not in arrears at the end of the tax year in an amount more than four times the monthly obligation under

a support order applicable to the child in cases where a payment schedule has not been established for payment of continuing support and accumulated arrears under the support order; or

a payment schedule if a payment schedule has been established for payment of continuing support and accumulated arrears under a support order applicable to the child.

In this section, “noncustodial parent” means the parent who has actual physical custody of the child for less time than the other parent.

History.

(§ 13 ch 132 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.24.155.
Reservation of issues.

The court may not delay or reserve a custody decision under AS

25.24.150(f)

or an issue of property division under AS

25.24.160(c)

unless

each party, and the guardian ad litem if one has been appointed under AS

25.24.310

, expressly agrees on the record to the delay or reservation; or

a party who moves for an order of delay or reservation shows good cause and the court finds that the interests of a party opposing the motion will not be jeopardized by the delay or reservation.

The court may not grant a motion under (a)(2) of this section if the court finds that granting the motion would

put the opposing party’s interests substantially at risk due to the death of the other party before a final disposition of the marital property;

diminish the ability of the party opposing the motion to protect the value of assets not in the party’s control;

not be in the best interests of each minor child whose custody would remain unresolved if the motion were granted;

have adverse tax consequences for the opposing party; or

have adverse consequences on the opposing party’s ability to maintain existing health insurance coverage.

History.

(§ 2 ch 76 SLA 1991)

Cross references. —

For effect of this section on Rule 54(b), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see § 5, ch. 76, SLA 1991 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 25.24.160.
Judgment.

In a judgment in an action for divorce or action declaring a marriage void or at any time after judgment, the court may provide

for the payment by either or both parties of an amount of money or goods, in gross or installments that may include cost-of-living adjustments, as may be just and proper for the parties to contribute toward the nurture and education of their children, and the court may order the parties to arrange with their employers for an automatic payroll deduction each month or each pay period, if the period is other than monthly, of the amount of the installment; if the employer agrees, the installment shall be forwarded by the employer to the clerk of the superior court that entered the judgment or to the court trustee, and the amount of the installment is exempt from execution;

for the recovery by one party from the other of an amount of money for maintenance, for a limited or indefinite period of time, in gross or in installments, as may be just and necessary without regard to which of the parties is in fault; an award of maintenance must fairly allocate the economic effect of divorce by being based on a consideration of the following factors:

the length of the marriage and station in life of the parties during the marriage;

the age and health of the parties;

the earning capacity of the parties, including their educational backgrounds, training, employment skills, work experiences, length of absence from the job market, and custodial responsibilities for children during the marriage;

the financial condition of the parties, including the availability and cost of health insurance;

the conduct of the parties, including whether there has been unreasonable depletion of marital assets;

the division of property under (4) of this subsection; and

other factors the court determines to be relevant in each individual case;

for the delivery to either party of that party’s personal property in the possession or control of the other party at the time of giving the judgment;

for the division between the parties of their property, including retirement benefits, whether joint or separate, acquired only during marriage, in a just manner and without regard to which of the parties is in fault; however, the court, in making the division, may invade the property, including retirement benefits, of either spouse acquired before marriage when the balancing of the equities between the parties requires it; and to accomplish this end the judgment may require that one or both of the parties assign, deliver, or convey any of their real or personal property, including retirement benefits, to the other party; the division of property must fairly allocate the economic effect of divorce by being based on consideration of the following factors:

the length of the marriage and station in life of the parties during the marriage;

the age and health of the parties;

the earning capacity of the parties, including their educational backgrounds, training, employment skills, work experiences, length of absence from the job market, and custodial responsibilities for children during the marriage;

the financial condition of the parties, including the availability and cost of health insurance;

the conduct of the parties, including whether there has been unreasonable depletion of marital assets;

the desirability of awarding the family home, or the right to live in it for a reasonable period of time, to the party who has primary physical custody of children;

the circumstances and necessities of each party;

the time and manner of acquisition of the property in question; and

the income-producing capacity of the property and the value of the property at the time of division;

if an animal is owned, for the ownership or joint ownership of the animal, taking into consideration the well-being of the animal.

If a judgment under this section distributes benefits to an alternate payee under AS 14.25, AS

21.51.120(a)

, AS

21.54.020(c)

,

21.54.050(c)

, AS 22.25, AS

26.05.222

—

26.05.226

, or AS 39.35, the judgment must meet the requirements of a qualified domestic relations order under the definition of that phrase that is applicable to those provisions.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, if one of the parties to an action for divorce or action declaring a marriage void expressly submits to the court the issue of property division and has not withdrawn that issue from the court before judgment, the court shall provide in the judgment for the division of property and may not reserve the issue of property division for a later time unless the conditions of AS

25.24.155

have been met.

For each judgment issued under this section, the court shall include in the records relating to the matter the social security numbers, if ascertainable, of the following persons:

each party to the action;

each child whose rights are addressed in the judgment.

When distributing property identified as community property under a community property agreement or trust under AS 34.77, unless the parties have provided in the agreement or trust for another disposition of the community property, the court shall make such disposition of the community property as shall appear just and equitable after considering all relevant factors, including

the nature and extent of the community property;

the nature and extent of the separate property;

the duration of the marriage; and

the economic circumstances of each spouse at the time the division of property is to become effective, including the desirability of awarding the family home or right to live in the family home for reasonable periods to a spouse with whom the children reside the majority of the time.

History.

(§ 12.14 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 84 SLA 1966; am §§ 2 — 6 ch 160 SLA 1968; am §§ 72, 73 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 5 ch 251 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 40 SLA 1985; am § 40 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 27 ch 117 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 130 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 133 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 76 SLA 1991; am § 43 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 6 ch 42 SLA 1998; am § 14 ch 132 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 52 SLA 2001; am § 46 ch 80 SLA 2006; am § 19 ch 60 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly
AS 09.55.210. Renumbered in 1983. Subsection (e) was enacted as subsection (d). Relettered in 1998, at which time the reference to “ AS 34.77” was substituted for “ AS 34.75” to reflect the 1998 renumbering of the chapter.

Cross references. —

For legislative intent in connection with the 1990 amendments to (a)(2) and (4) of this section, see § 1, ch. 130, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for effect of the enactment of subsection (c) on Rule 54(b), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see § 5, ch. 76, SLA 1991 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for other provisions relating to court-ordered child support, see AS

25.27.060

—

25.27.070

; for administratively-ordered child support, see AS 25.27; for court rule determining amount of child support, see Rule 90.3, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure. For effect of amendments to this section made by ch. 87, SLA 1997 on court rules, see § 151, ch. 87, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts; for purpose and findings provisions related to the amendments affecting this section made by ch. 132, SLA 1998, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 17, 2017, added (a)(5), and made a related change.

Sec. 25.24.165.
Change of name in divorce or annulment.

In a judgment in an action for divorce or action declaring a marriage void, the court may change the name of either of the parties.

If a party seeks a change of name to a name other than a prior name, the court shall set a date for hearing not less than 40 days after filing of the action. Notice of the application for a change of name to a name other than a prior name and the date of the hearing shall be published once each week for four consecutive calendar weeks before the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the judicial district. The court may also require posting of the notice at locations it considers appropriate. The court shall by judgment authorize the party to assume the new name not less than 30 days after issuance of the judgment, if the court is satisfied that no reasonable objection exists to assumption of the new name. Within 10 days after issuance of the judgment the party shall publish notice of the approval of the name change in a newspaper of general circulation in the judicial district. The court may also require the posting of a copy of the judgment.

History.

(§ 7 ch 130 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 84(a), see § 20, ch. 130, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 25.24.170.
Modification of judgment.

Subject to AS

25.20.110

, any time after judgment the court, upon the motion of either party, may set aside, alter, or modify so much of the judgment as may provide for alimony, for the appointment of trustees for the care and custody of the minor children or for their nurture and education, for the care, nurture, and education of unmarried 18-year-old children of the marriage while they are actively pursuing a high school diploma or an equivalent level of technical or vocational training and living as dependents with a parent, guardian, or designee of the parent or guardian, or for the maintenance of either party to the action.

For the purposes of a motion to modify or terminate child support, the adoption or enactment of guidelines or a significant amendment to guidelines for determining support is a material change in circumstances if the guidelines are relevant to the motion. As necessary to comply with 42 U.S.C. 666, a periodic modification of child support may be made without a showing of a material change in circumstances if the child support order being modified on the periodic basis has not been modified or adjusted during the three years preceding the periodic modification.

History.

(§ 12.15 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 4 ch 88 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 68 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 117 SLA 1992; am § 44 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.220. Renumbered in 1983.

In 1988 the word “terminate” was substituted for “revoke” in (b) of this section to correct a manifest error in sec. 2, ch. 68, SLA 1988.

Cross references. —

For court rule on modifications of child support orders, see Rule 90.3(h), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure. For effect of amendments to this section made by ch. 87, SLA 1997 on court rules, see § 152, ch. 87, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.